Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 281 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) A driveaway business that holds a proper driveaway certificate issued under KRS 281.630 may apply
for a driveaway plate with the county clerk in each county in which his or her principal office or
place of business, branch office, sub-agent, or agency is located.
(b) A driveaway plate allows a vehicle that has a valid registration of a declared gross vehicle weight to
be operated in driveaway service and shall be reusable until the driveaway plate expires or is revoked.
(c) The registration fee for initial issuance and annual renewal of a driveaway plate is one hundred fifty
dollars ($150) and is payable to the county clerk.
(2) Upon receipt of the one hundred fifty dollar ($150) fee, the county clerk shall issue a certificate of
registration and one (1) driveaway plate. The county clerk shall furnish each driveaway business that holds
a driveaway plate registered under this section with additional driveaway plates upon the payment of a
thirty-five dollar ($35) fee for each additional plate requested. Fifteen dollars ($15) of this fee shall be
retained by the county clerk for each additional plate issued.
(3) A driveaway plate issued under this section shall:
(a) Not be used on a vehicle operated on a highway except for the purpose of transporting vehicles in
transit;
(b) Not be used by tow truck operators transporting wrecked, disabled, abandoned, improperly parked, or
burned vehicles; and
(c) Be used only by owners, corporate officers, agents, or employees of the business to which the plate
was issued.
(4) Holders of a driveaway plate shall keep a record of each trip made using a driveaway plate. This record
shall include the:
(a) Vehicle identification number of the vehicle;
(b) Origin and destination of the vehicle;
(c) Total number of miles traveled; and
(d) Dates traveled.
(5) Driveaway plates issued under this section shall annually expire on December 31.
(6) If a driveaway certificate is revoked or not renewed, all driveaway plates issued under this section to the
driveaway business holding that driveaway certificate shall be returned to the cabinet.
(7) The cabinet shall be responsible for the issuance and cancellation of driveaway plates under this section,
and the enforcement of this section, except for the normal responsibilities of law enforcement agencies. The
cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this
section.
Section 2. KRS 281.631 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall act as a motor carrier without first obtaining a motor carrier vehicle license from the
department for each motor carrier vehicle.
(2) Application for and renewal of a motor carrier vehicle license shall be made in such form as the department
may require. Every motor carrier vehicle license shall be renewed annually.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) (a) Except for driveaway plates issued under Section 1 of this Act, and except as permitted under
paragraph (b) of this subsection, an applicant or license holder shall pay to the department the following
annual license fees:
1. Thirty dollars ($30) for each taxicab, limousine, TNC, or disabled persons vehicle;
2. Ten dollars ($10) for each motor carrier vehicle transporting household goods for hire;
3. One hundred dollars ($100) for each charter bus or bus;
4. Fifteen dollars ($15) for each motor carrier vehicle operating as a U-Drive-It;
5. Ten dollars ($10) for each motor carrier vehicle transporting property other than household
goods and those exempt under KRS 281.605; and
6. [Ten dollars ($10) for each motor carrier vehicle operating as a driveaway; and
7. ]Ten dollars ($10) for each automobile utility trailer.
(b) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to set forth an optional motor carrier vehicle
license fee schedule under this subsection on a bulk basis for applicants who employ or contract with
more than fifty (50) vehicles. Bulk application fees under these administrative regulations may use a
tiered system based on the type of certificate and the number of vehicles.
(4) Before the department may issue or renew a motor carrier vehicle license, the applicant or license holder shall:
(a) Pay the fee established under subsection (3) of this section;
(b) For a taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC vehicle, charter bus, and bus, provide a copy of
the vehicle registration for each out-of-state registered motor carrier vehicle being licensed, and if
necessary, a statement showing that the driver is an insured driver of the vehicle, and that the registered
owner or lessee authorizes the use of the vehicle for TNC services; and
(c) For a taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC vehicle, charter bus, and bus, obtain and retain
for a period of at least three (3) years, an inspection of the motor vehicle in the manner and form as the
department may require.
(5) No motor carrier vehicle shall be operated after the expiration of the motor carrier vehicle license under which
it is operated.
(6) All cities or counties of the Commonwealth may impose an annual license fee on an intrastate taxicab,
limousine, or disabled persons vehicle operated from said city or county. The annual license fee shall not
exceed thirty dollars ($30) per vehicle.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, nonresident motor carriers engaged in transporting
passengers for hire in irregular route interstate charter or special operations shall be exempt from all fees
prescribed in this chapter, if reciprocal privileges are granted to similar nonresident carriers by the laws and
regulations of his or her state.
(8) If any person required to pay a license fee under subsection (3) of this section begins the operation of an
additional motor carrier vehicle after the date of its certificate or renewal, the fee shall be as many twelfths of
the annual fee as there are unexpired months in the certificate or renewal year.
(9) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as it deems
necessary to administer this section[carry out].
Signed by Governor April 1, 2025.